tables/hbo.utb
# liblouis: Classical Hebrew
#
#-index-name: Hebrew, classical
#-display-name: Classical Hebrew braille
#
#+language: hbo
#+type: literary
#+contraction: no
#+system: ihbc-McAllister
#+dots: 6

#-license: lgpl-2.1

# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this file; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA  02110-1301  USA
# liblouis  comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.

# The first Hebrew Braille table hosted on Lib Louis was developed by
# the Library for the Blind and the Ministry of Education in
# Israel. That table is based on the IHBC which was developed in the
# mid-1930’s. Please see World Braille usage 3rd edition, p. 74.
#
# However, Classical or Biblical Hebrew, which is used in the Hebrew
# Bible and other liturgical literature, contains cantillation marks
# that are not supported by the Hebrew table mentioned above. This
# table seeks to provide access to these accents. This table is also
# based upon the tables mentioned above.  This table only departs from
# it where the accents are concerned. With this table, the user will
# have access to the accents and Masorah in BHS and BHS Quinta. For
# more information about the IHBC and how it was developed:
# <https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hebrew_Braille#:~:text=The%20International%20Hebrew%20Braille%20Code>
# also see:
# <https://huc.edu/library_blog/learning-about-hebrew-braille/#:~:text=The%20Code%20created%20by%20Brevis,books%20written%20in%20Hebrew%20Braille>

# Special thank you to Ray McAllister and Matthew Yeater for
# developing the braille for the cantillation. Also to Abby Howell for
# the suggestions to include support for Yiddish. Extra gratitude to
# Sarah LaRose, Eric Harvey, and Leonard de Ruijder for the helpful
# suggestions.

#-maintainer: Paul Geoghegan <contact@envisionly.tech>
#-maintainer: Matityhau Yeshurun <yeatersink@gmail.com>

# Copyright (C) 2024 Matt Yeater and Paul Geoghegan

always בֿ 1236  # bet with rafe
always פֿ 124  # Pe with rafe

letter ֒ 46-234  # segol - isolated
letter ֓ 46-146  # shalshelet
letter ֔ 2  # zaqef qatan
letter ֕ 46-1245  # zaqef gadol
letter ֖ 46-2345  # tipeha
letter ֗ 46-1235  # revia
letter ֘ 46-145  # zarqa
letter ֙ 46-34  # pashta
letter ֚ 46-245  # yetiv
letter ֛ 46-1236  # tevir
letter ֜ 46-1  # geresh
letter ֝ 46-16  # geresh muqdam
letter ֞ 46-12  # gershayim
letter ֟ 46-1345  # qarney para
letter ֠ 46-2356  # telisha gedola
letter ֡ 46-236  # pazer
letter ֢ 46-23  # atnah hafukh
letter ֣ 46-136  # munah
letter ֤ 46-125  # mahapakh
letter ֥ 46-134  # merkha
letter ֦ 46-13  # merkha kefula
letter ֧ 46-145  # darga
letter ֨ 46-1234  # qadma
letter ֩ 46-12345  # telisha qetana
letter ֪ 46-13456  # yerah ben yomo
letter ֫ 46-135  # ole
letter ֬ 46-24  # iluy
letter ֭ 46-24  # dehi
letter ֮ 46-1356  # zinor
letter ֯ 456-134  # masora circle
letter ֽ 4  # meteg
letter ֿ 45  # rafe
letter ׁ 456-4  # shin dot
letter ׂ 456-45  # sin dot
letter ׄ 456-5  # upper dot
letter ׅ 456-56  # lower dot
letter ׆ 456-1345  # nun hafukha
letter ׇ 126  # qamats qatan
letter װ 2456-2456  # double vav
letter ױ 2456-245  # vav yod
letter ײ 245-245  # double yod
letter ׳ 3  # geresh
letter ײַ 245-245-14  # Double Yod with patah

nofor always ך  16-0  # final kaf with  space
nofor always ך! 16-235  # final kaf with exclamation
nofor always ך" 16-6-2356  # final kaf with quote
nofor always ך) 16-5-345  # final kaf with  right parenthesis
nofor always ך, 16-2  # final kaf with comma
nofor always ך. 16-256  # final kaf with  period
nofor always ך/ 16-456-34  # final kaf with slash
nofor always ך: 16-56-25  # final kaf with  colon 
nofor always ך; 16-23  # final kaf with semi colon  
nofor always ך? 16-56-236  # final kaf with  question
nofor always ך\\ 16-456-16  # final kaf with back slash
nofor always ךְ 16-3  # final kaf with sheva
nofor always ך־ 16-36  # final kaf with  Mediq
nofor always ך׃ 16-256  # final kaf with sof passuk
nofor always ך” 16-356  # final kaf with right quote
nofor always ם  134-0  # final Mem with  space
nofor always ם! 134-235  # final Mem with  exclamation
nofor always ם" 134-6-2356  # final Mem with quote
nofor always ם) 134-5-345  # final Mem with  right parenthesis
nofor always ם, 134-2  # final Mem with  comma
nofor always ם. 134-256  # final Mem with  period
nofor always ם/ 134-456-34  # final Mem with  slash
nofor always ם: 134-25  # final Mem with  colon 
nofor always ם; 134-23  # final Mem with  semi colon
nofor always ם? 134-56-236  # final Mem with  question
nofor always ם\\ 134-456-16  # final Mem with  back slash
nofor always םְ 134-3  # final Mem with sheva 
nofor always ם־ 134-36  # final Mem with  Mediq
nofor always ם׃ 134-256  # final Mem with sof passuk
nofor always ם” 134-356  # final Mem with right quote
nofor always ן  1345-0  # final Nun with  space
nofor always ן! 1345-235  # final Nun with  exclamation
nofor always ן" 1345-6-2356  # final Nun with quote
nofor always ן) 1345-5-345  # final Nun with  right parenthesis
nofor always ן, 1345-2  # final Nun with  comma
nofor always ן. 1345-256  # final Nun with  period
nofor always ן/ 1345-456-34  # final Nun with  slash
nofor always ן: 1345-25  # final Nun with  colon
nofor always ן; 1345-23  # final Nun with  semi colon
nofor always ן? 1345-56-236  # final Nun with  question
nofor always ן\\ 1345-456-16  # final Nun with  Back slash
nofor always ןְ 1345  # final Nun with sheva
nofor always ן־ 1345-36  # final Nun with Mediq
nofor always ן׃ 1345-256  # final Nun with sof passuk
nofor always ן” 1345-356  # final Nun with right quote
nofor always ף  124-0  # final Pe with  space
nofor always ף! 124-235  # final Pe with  exclamation
nofor always ף" 124-6-2356  # final Pe with quote
nofor always ף) 124-5-345  # final Pe with  right parenthesis
nofor always ף, 124-2  # final Pe with  comma
nofor always ף. 124-256  # final Pe with  period
nofor always ף/ 124-456-34  # final Pe with  slash
nofor always ף: 124-25  # final Pe with  colon
nofor always ף; 124-23  # final Pe with  semi colon
nofor always ף? 124-56-236  # final Pe with  question
nofor always ף\\ 124-456-16  # final Pe with  back slash
nofor always ףְ 124-14  # final Pe with furtive patah
nofor always ף־ 124-36  # final Pe with Mediq
nofor always ף׃ 124-256  # final Pe with sof passuk
nofor always ף” 124-356  # final Pe with right quote
nofor always ץ  2346-0  # final tsadi with space
nofor always ץ! 2346-235  # final tsadi with  exclamation
nofor always ץ" 2346-6-2356  # final tsadi with quote
nofor always ץ) 2346-5-345  # final tsadi with  right parenthesis
nofor always ץ, 2346-2  # final tsadi with  comma
nofor always ץ. 2346-256  # final tsadi with  period
nofor always ץ/ 2346-456-34  # final tsadi with  slash
nofor always ץ: 2346-25  # final tsadi with  colon
nofor always ץ; 2346-23  # final tsadi with  semi colon
nofor always ץ? 2346-56-236  # final tsadi with  question
nofor always ץ\\ 2346-456-16  # final tsadi with  back slash
nofor always ץְ 2346-3  # final tsadi with sheva
nofor always ץ־ 2346-36  # final tsadi with Mediq
nofor always ץ׃ 2346-256  # final tsadi with sof passuk
nofor always ץ” 2346-356  # final tsadi with right quote

punctuation ֑ 23  # atnokta
punctuation ־ 36  # maqaf
punctuation ׀ 456  # paseq
punctuation ׃ 256  # sof pasuq
punctuation ״ 356  # gershayim

include critical-apparatus.uti
include he-common-vowels-ihbc.uti
include spaces.uti
include litdigits6Dots.uti
include latinLetterDef6Dots.uti
include en-ueb-chardefs.uti
